California, session 20252026, SB1256.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 66499.39 is added to the Government Code, immediately following Section 66499.38, to read:66499.39. (a) Any action or proceeding to enforce the Subdivision Map Act shall not be maintained, maintained if all of the following criteria exist:(1) The action or proceeding to enforce the Subdivision Map Act includes substantially similar claims or issues to claims or issues raised in an action or proceeding to enforce the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).(2) The defendant in the action or proceeding to enforce the Subdivision Map Act was the defendant in the action or proceeding to enforce the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).(3) The action or proceeding to enforce the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code), was commenced prior to January 1, 2019, and has been fully adjudicated.(4) The project that is the subject of the action or proceeding to enforce the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) meets all of the following requirements:(A) The project proposes at least 400 units of mixed-income housing.(B) The project includes a project labor agreement.(C) The project is located within the unincorporated area of a county that has a population of at least 3,000,000 and no greater than 4,000,000 residents.(D) The project has been approved by the lead agency.(5) The plaintiffs or petitioners plaintiffs, petitioners, or real parties in interest in the action or proceeding to enforce the Subdivision Map Act are the same or in privity with the plaintiffs or petitioners plaintiffs, petitioners, or real parties in interest in the action or proceeding to enforce the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).(b) Nothing in this section shall This section shall not be construed to do either any of the following:(1) Prohibit the filing of timely objections to an agency’s return to a writ seeking to enforce its specific mandates.(2) Prohibit the timely filing of a separate action relating to the same project.(3) Prohibit the timely filing of a Subdivision Map Act claim when necessary to enforce adherence to a mitigation measure identified in either of the following:(A) An approved environmental impact report.(B) A court order in, or an approved settlement of, an action or proceeding to enforce the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).(4) Abrogate a local agency’s obligation to comply with a procedural requirement of the Subdivision Map Act.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.